ro-RO: Sortiment de ceai: Ceai negru; Infuzie de fructe; Ceai verde; Infuzie de plante; Matcha; Ceai Oolong; Ceai Pu-erh; Rooibos; Ceai alb; Yerba mate; Altele
hu: Tea fajtája: Fekete tea; Gyümölcstea; Zöld tea; Gyógytea; Matcha; Oolong tea; Pu-erh tea; Rooibos; Fehér tea; Yerba mate; Egyéb
nb: Tevariant: Svart te; Frukt-te; Grønn te; Urte-te; Matcha; Oolong-te; Pu-erh-te; Rooibos; Hvit te; Yerba mate; Annet
el: Ποικιλία τσαγιού: Μαύρο τσάι; Αφέψημα φρούτων; Πράσινο τσάι; Αφέψημα βοτάνων; Matcha; Τσάι oolong; Τσάι pu-erh; Rooibos; Λευκό τσάι; Yerba mate; Άλλο
sl-SI: Sorta čaja: Črni čaj; Sadni čaj; Zeleni čaj; Zeliščni čaj; Matcha; Oolong čaj; Pu-erh čaj; Rooibos; Beli čaj; Yerba mate; Drugo
zh-CN: 茶叶品种: 红茶; 水果茶; 绿茶; 花草茶; 抹茶; 乌龙茶; 普洱茶; 路易波士茶; 白茶; 马黛茶; 其他
tr: Çay çeşidi: Siyah çay; Meyve çayı; Yeşil çay; Bitki çayı; Matcha; Oolong çayı; Pu-erh çayı; Rooibos; Beyaz çay; Yerba mate; Diğer
th: พันธุ์ชา: ชาดำ; ชาผลไม้; ชาเขียว; ชาสมุนไพร; มัทฉะ; ชาอู่หลง; ชาผู่เอ๋อร์; รอยบอส; ชาขาว; เยอร์บามาเต; อื่นๆ
pl: Odmiana herbaty: Czarna herbata; Napar owocowy; Zielona herbata; Napar ziołowy; Matcha; Herbata oolong; Herbata pu-erh; Rooibos; Biała herbata; Yerba mate; Inna
en: Tea variety: Black tea; Fruit infusion; Green tea; Herbal infusion; Matcha; Oolong tea; Pu-erh tea; Rooibos; White tea; Yerba mate; Other
fi: Teelajike: Musta tee; Hedelmähauduke; Vihreä tee; Yrttihauduke; Matcha; Oolong-tee; Pu-erh-tee; Rooibos; Valkoinen tee; Yerba mate; Muu
pt-BR: Variedade de chá: Chá preto; Infusão de frutas; Chá verde; Infusão de ervas; Matchá; Chá oolong; Chá pu-erh; Rooibos; Chá branco; Erva-mate; Outro
ja: お茶の種類: 紅茶; フルーツティー; 緑茶; ハーブティー; 抹茶; 烏龍茶; プーアル茶; ルイボス; 白茶; マテ茶; その他
ru: Сорт чая: Чёрный чай; Фруктовый чай; Зелёный чай; Травяной чай; Матча; Улун; Пуэр; Ройбуш; Белый чай; Йерба мате; Другое
vi: Loại trà: Trà đen; Trà trái cây; Trà xanh; Trà thảo mộc; Matcha; Trà ô long; Trà phổ nhĩ; Hồng trà Nam Phi (Rooibos); Trà trắng; Trà yerba mate; Khác
es: Variedad de té: Té negro; Infusión de frutas; Té verde; Infusión de hierbas; Matcha; Té oolong; Té pu-erh; Rooibos; Té blanco; Yerba mate; Otra
cs: Druh čaje: Černý čaj; Ovocný čaj; Zelený čaj; Bylinný čaj; Matcha; Čaj oolong; Čaj pu-erh; Rooibos; Bílý čaj; Yerba maté; Jiné
da: Tevariant: Sort te; Frugtte; Grøn te; Urtete; Matcha; Oolong-te; Pu-erh-te; Rooibos; Hvid te; Yerba mate; Andet
zh-TW: 茶葉種類: 紅茶; 水果茶; 綠茶; 花草茶; 抹茶; 烏龍茶; 普洱茶; 南非國寶茶; 白茶; 瑪黛茶; 其他
it: Varietà di tè: Tè nero; Infuso di frutta; Tè verde; Tisana; Matcha; Tè oolong; Tè Pu-erh; Rooibos; Tè bianco; Yerba mate; Altro
ko: 차 품종: 홍차; 과일 인퓨전; 녹차; 허브 인퓨전; 말차; 우롱차; 보이차; 루이보스; 백차; 예르바 마테; 기타
fr: Variété de thé: Thé noir; Infusion aux fruits; Thé vert; Tisane; Matcha; Thé oolong; Thé pu-erh; Rooibos; Thé blanc; Yerba maté; Autre
sv: Tesort: Svart te; Fruktte; Grönt te; Örtte; Matcha; Oolong-te; Pu-erh-te; Rooibos; Vitt te; Yerba mate; Annat
sk-SK: Druh čaju: Čierny čaj; Ovocný čaj; Zelený čaj; Bylinný čaj; Matcha; Čaj oolong; Čaj pu-erh; Rooibos; Biely čaj; Yerba maté; Iné
bg-BG: Сорт чай: Черен чай; Плодова инфузия; Зелен чай; Билкова инфузия; Матча; Улонг чай; Пуер чай; Ройбос; Бял чай; Йерба мате; Друго
pt-PT: Variedade de chá: Chá preto; Infusão de frutas; Chá verde; Infusão de ervas; Matcha; Chá oolong; Chá pu-erh; Rooibos; Chá branco; Erva-mate; Outro
nl: Theevariëteit: Zwarte thee; Vruchtenthee; Groene thee; Kruidenthee; Matcha; Oolong-thee; Pu-erh-thee; Rooibos; Witte thee; Yerba mate; Overig
lt-LT: Arbatos rūšis: Juodoji arbata; Vaisinė arbata; Žalioji arbata; Žolelių arbata; Matcha; Ulongo arbata; Puerh arbata; Rooibos; Baltoji arbata; Yerba mate; Kita
hr-HR: Sorta čaja: Crni čaj; Voćni čaj; Zeleni čaj; Biljni čaj; Matcha; Oolong čaj; Pu-erh čaj; Rooibos; Bijeli čaj; Yerba mate; Ostalo
de: Auswahl an Tees: Schwarztee; Früchtetee; Grüntee; Kräutertee; Matcha; Oolong-Tee; Pu-Erh-Tee; Rooibos; Weißer Tee; Yerba Mate; Sonstige